Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 458.
SECTION 2. (1) The Housing and Community  Services Department shall award loans to
be used for the predevelopment costs of developing new housing.
(2) Eligible predevelopment costs that may be funded by loans under this section include:
(a) Professional services, including architectural,  engineering, land use planning or legal
services;
(b) Studies, including site feasibility, market,  environmental, traffic, land, zoning,
geotechnical, arborist or capital needs assessments;
(c) Development fees, including entitlement, permitting or state application fees;
(d) Community engagement efforts; or
(e) Other costs  that can be directly connected to and assist with specific development
projects and meet standards developed by the department.
(3) Loans provided under this section may not be used to purchase land.
(4) To be eligible for loans under this section, the new housing  must be subject to an
affordability restriction making the property affordable to rent or own by a  low income
household, as defined in ORS 456.270, for  a minimum period as established by the depart-
ment, and may include housing that is established as part of a limited equity cooperative.
(5) Eligible entities for a loan under this section include only recipients that are a:
(a) Public benefit or religious nonprofit corporation;
(b) Federally recognized Indian tribe operating within this state;
(c) Housing authority; or
(d) Developer that is partnering  with an identified entity described under paragraphs (a)
to (c) of this subsection.
SECTION 3.
(1) No  later than June 1, 2026, the Housing and Community Services De-
partment shall complete any  initial rulemaking to administer the loan program under section
2 of this 2025 Act and develop the loan applications.
(2) In adopting rules for, and  developing and implementing, the loan program under this
section, the department is directed to combine the program with the existing predevelopment
loan programs operated by the  department, including the Predevelopment Loan Program
described in OAR 813-038, but excepting any program for agricultural workforce housing.
Enrolled House Bill 2964 (HB 2964-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House April 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2964 (HB 2964-A) Page 2